Utah statutes.
31A-22-1406.   Preexisting conditions.

(1)  A long-term care insurance policy or certificate may not use a definition of a preexisting condition which is more restrictive than the following: "Preexisting condition means a condition for which medical advice or treatment was recommended by or received from a provider of health care services, within six months preceding the effective date of coverage of an insured person."

(2)  A long-term care insurance policy or certificate may not exclude coverage for a loss or confinement which is the result of a preexisting condition unless such loss or confinement begins within six months following the effective date of coverage of an insured person.

(3)  The commissioner may extend the preexisting condition periods provided in Subsections (1) and (2) as to specific age group categories in specific policy forms upon finding that the extension is in the best interest of the public.

(4) (a)  The definition of preexisting condition does not prohibit an insurer from using an application form designed to elicit the complete health history of an applicant and from underwriting in accordance with that insurer's established underwriting standards on the basis of the answers on that application.

(b)  Unless otherwise provided in the policy or certificate, a preexisting condition, regardless of whether it is disclosed on the application, need not be covered until the waiting period described in Subsection (2) expires.

(c)  A long-term care insurance policy or certificate may not exclude or use waivers or riders of any kind to exclude, limit, or reduce coverage or benefits for specifically named or described preexisting diseases or physical condition beyond the waiting period described in Subsection (2).

